District of Columbia statutes.
26-1023

Criminal penalties.

(a)

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this chapter for which a penalty is not specifically provided shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned for more than 1 year, or both.

(b)

Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a material, false statement in any document filed or required to be filed under this chapter with the intent to deceive the recipient of the document shall be guilty of a felony and, on conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $10,000, or imprisoned for not more than 3 years, or both.

(c)

Any person who engages in the business of money transmission without a license as provided herein shall be guilty of a felony and, on conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $25,000, or imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 24, 47 DCR 3431